Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 2203, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2203. A. The Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation
Commission shall be an advisory body to the Executive Director of
the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department and shall consist of
eight (8) members who shall serve a term of six (6) years.
Effective January 14, 2019, all duties and powers of the Commission
shall be transferred to the Executive Director. Any provision in
statute that provides to the Commission authority that is not
advisory in nature shall be deemed to grant the duty or power to the
Executive Director. No more than one Commission member shall be

from any one county. The Lieutenant Governor shall serve as an ex
officio voting member of the Commission.
B. Each appointed member of the Commission shall demonstrate
experience in one or more of the following fields directly related
to economic growth and tourism development:
1. Hospitality management;
2. Venue management;
3. Tourism promotion;
4. Real estate development;
5. Outdoor recreation;
6. Marketing and branding; and
7. Financial operations.
C. One member shall be appointed from each congressional
district, who shall be a resident and a qualified elector in the
district from which appointed, and the remaining members shall be
appointed from the state at large. If congressional districts are
redrawn each member appointed shall complete the current term of
office at which time a new appointment shall be made in compliance
with the redrawn congressional district.
C. D. Commission members shall be appointed by the Governor,
with the advice and consent of the Senate, and shall serve at the
pleasure of the Governor. Whenever a vacancy on the Commission
occurs by death, resignation, or otherwise, the Governor shall fill
the same by appointment, with the advice and consent of the Senate,
and the appointee shall hold office during the unexpired term. Each
member shall hold office until a successor has been appointed and
qualified. Five members of the Commission shall constitute a
quorum, and the vote of the majority of members present shall be
necessary for any action to be taken by the Commission. No vacancy
in the membership of the Commission shall impair the rights of a
quorum to exercise and perform all the rights and duties of the
Commission.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1327 Page 2

D. E. With the exception of the ex officio, no member of the
Commission shall seek election to a federal, state, or county office
while serving on the Commission.
F. Each member of the Commission, before serving on the
Commission, shall take and subscribe to the constitutional and
statutory oaths of office and file the oaths with the Secretary of
State. Members of the Commission shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses to Commission meetings as provided in the State Travel
Reimbursement Act.
G. The Commission shall be organized by the Governor who shall
appoint from the Commission the chair, the vice chair, and the
secretary. The Commission shall adopt rules pursuant to the
provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act to execute the
powers and duties of the Commission and the Oklahoma Tourism and
Recreation Department.
H. The Commission may meet monthly and shall meet at least
quarterly. The Commission may meet at such other times as it deems
necessary for effectively performing its duties and
responsibilities. Special meetings may be called by the chair or by
any three members of the Commission. The meetings of the Commission
shall be subject to the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act.
I. The Commission is hereby declared to be a governmental
agency and instrumentality of this state with authority to exercise,
in addition to those it now has, the rights, privileges, and
functions specified.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 2204, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2204. There are hereby granted to and imposed in the
Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Commission, and in any commission or
body which may succeed to the powers, rights, and duties of the
Commission, Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department the following
additional powers, rights, and duties:
1. Sue and be sued;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1327 Page 3

2. Adopt, use, and alter an official seal;
3. Make bylaws for the management and regulation of its
affairs;
4. Appoint, prescribe the duties, and fix the compensation for
officers, agents, and employees;
5. Make contracts and execute instruments as in the judgment of
the Department Commission are necessary or convenient to the
exercise of the powers conferred upon it by law; and
6. Promulgate rules and policies necessary and convenient to
the exercise of the powers conferred upon it by law.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 2206, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2206. The chief executive officer of the Oklahoma
Tourism and Recreation Department shall be the Executive Director,
who shall be appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent
of the Senate, Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Commission, and who
shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor Commission and may be
removed or replaced without cause. The Executive Director shall be
chosen with regard to knowledge, training, experience, and ability
to administer the functions of the Department. Compensation for The
Commission shall establish the salary of the Executive Director
shall be determined pursuant to Section 3601.2 of this title.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1327 Page 4

Passed the Senate the 11th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1327 Page 5